Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1651.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1651.1. A. The Council on Judicial Complaints is
authorized to provide funding for the attendance and participation
of state, municipal, and administrative judges in professional and
educational programs, schools, or conferences for the purpose of
improving the quality of the Oklahoma Judiciary and to improve the
administration of justice in this state. The Council may contract
or partner with public or private entities or otherwise fund and
Req. No. 16052 Page 1

part icipate in the development, implementation, and conduct of
professional and educational programs for judges.
B. Professional and education programs, schools, or conferences
provided by the Council on Judicial Complaints as authorized by
subsection A of this section shall satisfy mandatory judicial
continuing legal education requirements without additional approval.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16052 AQH 02/02/26















Req. No. 16052 Page 2